dictionaries/ru_RU/ru_RU_oo3.aff
SFX U Y 162
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЕЫШУС       ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЕФУС        ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЕФЕУШ       ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЕНУС        ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЈЫШУС       ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЈФУС        ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЈФЕУШ       ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЦЈНУС        ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЗХФУС        ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШУС ЗХУШ         ЮШУС
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЕЫШ         ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЕФЕ         ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЕФ          ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЕН          ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЈЫШ         ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЈФЕ         ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЈФ          ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЦЈН          ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЗХФ          ЮШ
SFX U   ЮШ   ЗХ           ЮШ
SFX U   ШУС  УС           ХФШУС
SFX U   ШУС  УС           ПСФШУС
SFX U   ШУС  УС           [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЕЫШУС        БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЕФУС         БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЕФЕУШ        БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЕНУС         БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС АФУС         БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС АУШ          БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЈЫШУС        БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЈФУС         БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЈФЕУШ        БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШУС ЈНУС         БЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЕЫШ          БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЕФЕ          БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЕФ           БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЕН           БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ АФ           БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ А            БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЈЫШ          БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЈФЕ          БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЈФ           БЧБФШ
SFX U   ЧБФШ ЈН           БЧБФШ
SFX U   ХФШУС ЕЫШУС        ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЕФУС         ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЕНУС         ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЈЫШУС        ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЈФУС         ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЈФЕУШ        ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШУС ЈНУС         ХФШУС
SFX U   ХФШ  Х            ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЕЫШ          ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЕФЕ          ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЕФ           ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЕН           ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЈЫШ          ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЈФЕ          ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЈФ           ХФШ
SFX U   ХФШ  ЈН           ХФШ
SFX U   ФШУС УШ           ХФШУС
SFX U   ФШУС ЕЫШУС        [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   ФШУС ЕФУС         [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   ФШУС ЕФЕУШ        [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   ФШУС ЕНУС         [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   ФШУС АФУС         [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   ФШУС АУШ          [^БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   ФШ   Ф            ХФШ
SFX U   ФШ   Ф            ПСФШ
SFX U   ФШ   Ф            [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШ
SFX U   ФШ   ЕЫШ          [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   ФШ   ЕФЕ          [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   ФШ   ЕФ           [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   ФШ   ЕН           [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   ФШ   АФ           [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   ФШ   А            [^БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   СФШУС ЙЫШУС        ПСФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЙФУС         ПСФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЙФЕУШ        ПСФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЙНУС         ПСФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЕЫШУС        [БЕХ]СФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЕФУС         [БЕХ]СФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЕФЕУШ        [БЕХ]СФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС ЕНУС         [БЕХ]СФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС АФУС         [БЕХ]СФШУС
SFX U   СФШУС АУШ          [БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX U   СФШ  ЙЫШ          ПСФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЙФЕ          ПСФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЙФ           ПСФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЙН           ПСФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЕЫШ          [БЕХ]СФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЕФЕ          [БЕХ]СФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЕФ           [БЕХ]СФШ
SFX U   СФШ  ЕН           [БЕХ]СФШ
SFX U   СФШ  АФ           [БЕХ]СФШ
SFX U   СФШ  А            [БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX U   ПЧБФШУС ХЕЫШУС       ПЧБФШУС
SFX U   ПЧБФШУС ХЕФУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX U   ПЧБФШУС ХЕФЕУШ       ПЧБФШУС
SFX U   ПЧБФШУС ХЕНУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX U   ПЧБФШУС ХАФУС        ПЧБФШУС
SFX U   ПЧБФШУС ХАУШ         ПЧБФШУС
SFX U   ПЧБФШ ХЕЫШ         ПЧБФШ
SFX U   ПЧБФШ ХЕФЕ         ПЧБФШ
SFX U   ПЧБФШ ХЕФ          ПЧБФШ
SFX U   ПЧБФШ ХЕН          ПЧБФШ
SFX U   ПЧБФШ ХАФ          ПЧБФШ
SFX U   ПЧБФШ ХА           ПЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ХЕЫШУС       [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ХЕФУС        [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ХЕФЕУШ       [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ХЕНУС        [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ХАФУС        [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ХАУШ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС АЕЫШУС       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС АЕФУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС АЕФЕУШ       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС АЕНУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ААФУС        [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШУС ААУШ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ХЕЫШ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ХЕФЕ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ХЕФ          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ХЕН          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ХАФ          [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ХА           [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ АЕЫШ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ АЕФЕ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ АЕФ          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ АЕН          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ ААФ          [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   ЕЧБФШ АА           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX U   БФШУС ХФУС         ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ХУШ          ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ХУШ          [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЙЫШУС        [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЙФУС         [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЙФЕУШ        [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЙНУС         [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЕЫШУС        ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЕФУС         ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЕНУС         ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЈЫШУС        ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЈФУС         ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЈФЕУШ        ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШУС ЈНУС         ДБФШУС
SFX U   БФШ  ХФ           ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  Х            ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  Х            [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЙЫШ          [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЙФЕ          [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЙФ           [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЙН           [ЦЫЭЮ]БФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЕЫШ          ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЕФЕ          ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЕФ           ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЕН           ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЈЫШ          ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЈФЕ          ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЈФ           ДБФШ
SFX U   БФШ  ЈН           ДБФШ

SFX T Y 38
SFX T   ХФШУС ШФЕУШ        ХФШУС
SFX T   ХФШУС ШУС          ХФШУС
SFX T   ХФШ  ШФЕ          ХФШ
SFX T   ХФШ  Ш            ХФШ
SFX T   УБФШУС ЫЙФЕУШ       УБФШУС
SFX T   УБФШУС ЫЙУШ         УБФШУС
SFX T   УБФШ ЫЙФЕ         УБФШ
SFX T   УБФШ ЫЙ           УБФШ
SFX T   СФШУС КФЕУШ        [БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX T   СФШУС КУС          [БЕПХ]СФШУС
SFX T   СФШ  КФЕ          [БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX T   СФШ  К            [БЕПХ]СФШ
SFX T   ПЧБФШУС ХКФЕУШ       ПЧБФШУС
SFX T   ПЧБФШУС ХКУС         ПЧБФШУС
SFX T   ПЧБФШ ХКФЕ         ПЧБФШ
SFX T   ПЧБФШ ХК           ПЧБФШ
SFX T   ЙФШУС ШФЕУШ        [^БЕП]ЙФШУС
SFX T   ЙФШУС ШУС          [^БЕП]ЙФШУС
SFX T   ЙФШУС КФЕУШ        [БЕП]ЙФШУС
SFX T   ЙФШУС КУС          [БЕП]ЙФШУС
SFX T   ЙФШ  ШФЕ          [^БЕП]ЙФШ
SFX T   ЙФШ  Ш            [^БЕП]ЙФШ
SFX T   ЙФШ  КФЕ          [БЕП]ЙФШ
SFX T   ЙФШ  К            [БЕП]ЙФШ
SFX T   ЕЧБФШУС ХКФЕУШ       [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX T   ЕЧБФШУС ХКУС         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX T   ЕЧБФШУС АКФЕУШ       [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX T   ЕЧБФШУС АКУС         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШУС
SFX T   ЕЧБФШ ХКФЕ         [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX T   ЕЧБФШ ХК           [ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX T   ЕЧБФШ АКФЕ         [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX T   ЕЧБФШ АК           [^ГЦЫЭЮ]ЕЧБФШ
SFX T   ЕФШУС ЙФЕУШ        ЕФШУС
SFX T   ЕФШУС ЙУШ          ЕФШУС
SFX T   ЕФШ  ЙФЕ          ЕФШ
SFX T   ЕФШ  Й            ЕФШ
SFX T   БФШУС ЙУШ          [ЦЮ]БФШУС
SFX T   БФШ  Й            [ЦЮ]БФШ
